norsk/patterns/norsk.single.pat
.a2
.aa2
.a4b
.ab6ba
.ac6ti
.ad2r
.ai2
.a8l
.an7d6ra
.an3s4
.an6tit
.ap4r
.ari6a7
.ari4e
.a4s
.assi3
.ast7ru
.au4ren
.au8rer
.au5str
.aux2
.av7l6
.b8
.ba6ko
.bede6
.be6d7ene
.be6d7et
.be7s8ka
.bi4e
.bie7ne
.bi5s4ta
.bit3r
.boar4
.bu4e7re
.bu7ern
.bø8nen
.bø8ner
.ca4se
.d8
.de8ri.
.do8ver
.dro4p7l
.dø2r
.dør3e
.e8
.efo5
.ef6ta
.ei8da.
.ei6d7an
.ei8e
.eie7ne
.eik5a
.ei6kan
.ei6nara
.ei6n7as
.ei8ru
.el8s
.el8ve.
.em3b
.en6t7ra
.ent8re
.er4gr
.er8ke
.es1
.est3r
.et8sa.
.et8se.
.f6
.fa4e
.fa8ta.
.fei4l5i
.fi8a
.fi8e
.fisk7å
.ford8rar
.for7en.
.for5e8ne
.fri5e6re
.fø7rar
.føy8ed
.g4
.ga6me
.ge8a
.gi8a
.gi8ne
.gjer7s8la
.go8da.
.go8de.
.grei6e
.gø4
.he4n
.hes3j
.hes4s5
.ho9la
.i2
.i3a8
.ib4
.i3bl
.id2
.ik6
.i3kl
.i7kv
.i3leg
.in3gr
.ink2
.in8na.
.i7sc
.is8le.
.i5s4p
.ist8
.is4ta
.is7tr
.i6van
.i8var.
.i8ver.
.i6vere
.i7ø8
.je2m
.ju7te
.k4
.ki2e
.ko7me
.ko9mi
.ku7te
.køye7
.køy7rar.
.l8
.le8er
.li6a
.li2g
.li6v5en
.lu2e
.lu7te
.ly4din
.ly8sa.
.læk3j
.løye7ne
.m8
.me4tri
.min4s
.mins5ki
.mo8de.
.mon4st
.monst5r
.mue8
.mu7te
.n8
.ne8de.
.ne4den
.ne8t
.ni8ar
.ni8er
.ni3tr
.o8
.og6n
.ol8ja.
.ol8je.
.om5ans
.ome6n
.om3s6
.on6kl
.op4p3a
.op4pe
.opp7s4
.or6dr
.or4g3l
.ort6
.os8kar
.ou4te
.ova6n
.ove2
.over5
.overen8
.ov3u
.p8
.pe8nar
.po6et
.pu7te
.pøn7s4
.r6
.ra6m
.re8le.
.re5stan
.ri4e
.rie7n
.rins7ke
.rip3o
.ri6s7ø
.ro6a
.ru7te
.ry8e
.rye7n
.rø6ta
.s8
.sag4n
.se3a
.se2b
.se4er
.se5ge
.serie7n
.seri8ene
.set7je.
.si8er
.sk8
.ski4n
.sku6e
.sku7te
.sl6
.soa2
.st4
.stu8a
.su4i
.su4ri
.sæ4r3
.t8
.te4e
.te6i
.ti8an
.ti6e
.ti6g3r
.ti2l3
.ti4p5
.to9ry
.tu7te
.tø4vi
.u1a2
.u1b2
.u8berg
.u1d4
.u3e2
.u8er.
.u6era
.u6ere
.u3fl
.u2ga
.u1i
.u1k8
.u8ka.
.u2ke
.u7kn
.u8la.
.u8le.
.ulen8d
.u8lende
.u8lene
.u8let
.u4ling
.u2ni
.u7nu
.u1o6
.u3p6l
.u8ra.
.u6ral
.u6ras
.ure8n
.u8ret.
.u8rets
.u8ria
.u4rin
.u3ro
.u3ry
.u1s
.us8le
.us4m
.us2p
.us2t
.us6tr
.u7sv
.u2ta
.u6tel
.u4ten
.u4t5es
.u8ti.
.ut6rer
.v2
.vai6a
.vai6e
.vari4e
.ve2d
.ve4g3i
.vei8ta
.ve8ras
.vers8
.ver7ste
.vi8e
.vi8s7an
.vy8an
.vy8e7ne
.wie3
.xe2
.y4
.yns7
.ys2
.ys4ta
.æ8
.ær7an
.ærle8ge
.ø2
.øl6
.øn2
.øns5ki
.ør6je
.ør3st
.ør8t7an
.ør6u
.øs2
.øs8te.
.øya8
.øy4e
.øy7ene
.øy8na
.øy4ne
.øy2r
.øys2
.å2
.å8e
.åk2
.å8l
.ås5k
.å3s2t
.åt8te.
aa8g
aa8ka
aak7v
aa2n
a5ane
a3ani
aa2s
ab8by
a7bh
ab1l
ab7la
ab3ri
aby1
a3cl
a1co
a7cu
adie7ne
ad1j
ad1r
a3d4ras
ad7ret
ad1s8
a3dy
a6d7øy
a1e2
ae3de
a2e3l
afa8se.
a3fj
af3l
afo3
afor4
a8ft
af7to
afø6
ag5gl
agi6s
agist7r
ag1l
ag5o8m
a2gr
ag3ri
agu3ay
8a1h
a7hi
ah4n5
a6hv
ai3a4
ai7d
a6il
a3ing
ai5ro
a3isk
a3ist
a1j
a8jé
a8ji
a1ka
ak7aa
a6k7eg
akhe8n
a1ki
ak7l
a1ko
ak7om.
ako6v
ak7ove
aks4t5re
a1ku
a5kø
a1la
ala7p
albo4g
alei7e6
ales2
al3inn
alli5e
almue8
a1lo
alo8ida
alori7
als6kare
a1lu
a1ly
a3lø
a8l7øy
a5lå
am3arb
a2m3ei
ame4tr
amfa8
am3org
am2pl
am8pr
amst6
am4s3tr
a3mur
am7yr
a8n7av
an3erk
an8geste
ang7res
ang7s6l
ang8ø
an3iso
an4kie
an2k3r
an4kø
an8nev
an4n5inn
annle8
an7org
a7norm
ansi6er
ans7kan
ans5kar
an2sp
ans3pi
an6tim
an4tri
a1n8u
a1nø
an5å
aog7
ao1i
a4p3ak
a1pi
ap7lo
apo3p
apo5s4ti
ap1p2
ap4ple
ap3r
ap4ro
ap2sk
ap2s7l
a1py
ap7ø
a5på
4a1ra
arbi3
are7al.
4aren
a1ré
ar5gh
arie7ne
arins7
ar2kl
6arn
arne3s4
a1ro
aro6i
ar6ru
ar7s8h
art6ha
art5rin
ar4tro
ar3ul
a1ry
4as.
a3sc
ash3
asha8
as1k
as6kim
a5s6kj
as6kø
a6s1l
as1m
as5pin
asp7l
assis4t
as3ta
as6tab
as3to
a3s4tok
as3tu
a1t
atch5
a4té
at6ha
a6tj
at6ki
a6t7oi
at6sm
at8t7o
a5tu
a2t1v
a7ty
a4u
au3c
au4e5re
au1i
auk7l
au3ru
auru4e
aus3h
aus5p
aus7tan
aus6tar
au3te
a1va
a4v3ang
avarie8
a1ve
a1vi
av7inde
a4v3inn
avlu7t
a1vo
av3r
a1væ
a1vø
a1w
1ba
ba5a
back7
ba8kat
bak3v
ba7ny
bari6en
ba3ru
ba8sed
bassis5
ba3z
2b1b
bb2l
b4bute
2b1d
1be
be3ak
be3ar
bedi7e
be5ed
be1g
be3gl
be6i
beir8
be4k5i
be3k2l
be7kn
be3kv
beng8u
be1o
3be5re
be3ro
be3rå
be1s2
bes6sel
be8sten
bes8tene
be3tj
be6t5rar
be6tre.
be4tri
be3ty
be1v
7bé
6bf
2bh
1bi
bi3b2
bi6bla
bi1d
bi8dea
bir8ken
b7ish
bis7le
bisp5i
bi7sto
bi7z
bjø8
b7k
blak3
b3lane
b3lar
b6larar
b2lem
bl6j
blja6
b6lu
bly7gl
6b6m
2b1n
1bo
bob6bya
bo3is
bok3s
bolst4
bol4t3r
bom3
boo2
book5
boom7
boom5en
boom9er.
bor8ti
bo3sk
bos2t
bo3ste
bo7t6r
b2r
b4rae
brei7e
bres7t
b4rio
bros8t
bru3r
bråe8
2b1s
bs2t
4b1t
1bu
bu8h
bu3in
bu3ru
2but.
bu3tø
b3v
b1w
1by
bya4n
by7are
bæ6ra.
bæ8rar.
1bø
bø8ke.
bø6na
bøy6e7ne
bøy8et
1ca
car6s7
car8te.
ca2sa
ca7s6til
cath7
8cc
c1ci
ce7a
ce8g
5cep
1cer
ce3ro
ce3ty
c8h
4ch.
8chs
ci2e
ci7et
ci6ty
2c4k
ck7an
ck3ar.
ck3en
ck3er.
ck7erse
ck3et
ck3i
ck3ou
ck3s4
ck1u2
ckup3
c2l
cly6
coa8
coat3
co6c
4cor
3cô
c2r
crack6
cre2e
creen3
c4s
6ct
c7tio
c7ty
c6u
8cu.
3cue
cu6t
1cy
cy1k
1da
da5br
da2fe
da8fé
dag3r
da1i
d8ane
dan7s8kan
2d3arb
8d7arn
da8r7o
da8taa
dat6s
2d1b
2d1d
ddi7e
d7dl
dd6la
dd7r
1de
dea9r
de3ch
de7cr
deie7
dei6ene
de3ist
de5it
de3k2l
deks6t
de5kv
de1p
de6rif
de6rim
de3ro
de8rom
der5ska
de7rå
de3sc
4des2p
de3spe
des3po
de3s2t
de8sto
de1v
2d1f
2d7g
2d1h
1di
dia1
di4as4
di7ce
di5e4l
di6ene
die5nes
di4ert
di8g7and
8dim.
di7ne
ding6s7a
ding4s5e
2d3inn
di3ok
di1p
disi8e7ne
dis5t
dis8tre
ditori7e8
di3tr
4dje
d8jingan
d8jingar
6djupar
2d1k
2d1l
8dle
dli8f
2d1m
dmini3
2d1n
1do
do3i
dorm8
dors8
dor7ska
dor5ske
do7ry
do3sk
8dost
do3ve
2d1p
8d7raa
3d4rag
d8rang
d6rarar
2dre.
d2rea
5dreass
8dred
d2reg
d2rei
drei7ern
d2rek
2dren
2drer
7d2rev
d2rif
2drik
3d4ril
2drin
d2riv
2dru
d5rum
dry8pe
8ds
ds3h
d3ska
d7skj
dsl6
ds7las
d5slett
d3s6ta
d7stø
ds7v
ds3vo
d7sy
d6sø
2d1t
d2t3v
d5t4ve
1du
du5c
dunderle8
dun7s6
2dut
d3ute
2d1v
2d1w
dy7a
1dø
døt3
d7øyan
då7rar
då8rare
8d7åt
4ea
e1a2b
ea2d3i
ea8k
e3aks
e3akt
ea2m3
e8an.
e3and
e3a4ne.
e6ans.
e3ansk
ea7p
e3ar.
ea7ra
ea8ran
ea4se.
ea4s3i
e5ass
ea6t7et
eat8h
eat8l
2e1b
eb1h
ebo8r
e7b8u
2ec
ec8c
e1ce
e3cha
2e1d
e8d7ad
e6daf
e4dé
edi4a5ne
ed5j
e2dre
ed3sk
ed7øy
e1e2
ee4a7
ee3di
e8eg
e2e3i
e2ek3
ee6l
e3er
eer3en
ee3ri
efe5d6
2efi
e7fj
e1fl
e1fr
e5fæ
eg4e
e7gé
eg3la
eglo5i
eg8n7o
e1gø
e7gå
e1h
ehers7
ehå6r
ei3a2n
ei3as
e3i2do
eid7r
ei5d4u
7eidv
ei8el.
ei5ende
ei2er
ei6gu
ei3kj
ei2nu
4eis
ei3s6h
e3isk.
e3iske
eis4t3r
ei6to
eit7r
e1j
e1ka
e1ki
e6ki.
ekis6t
e1kj
e1ko
e1kr
e4k5ri
ek4sal
ek2sæ
ektori6a
ek4t3ra
ek6tv
e1ku
e1ky
e1la
2ele
e8lea.
el7eig
e6lé.
2eli
eli7e6rer
eli3kv
ell7ang
ell7s6
e1lo
el7ph
el2tr
e1lu
e1ly
e1lø
el3øy
e1lå
e8m7ad
e7med
emi7s6a
em8lj
emo8a
emo3no
em2pl
emp7la
em2sl
emst6
e3mun
e3mus
e1my
e7mø
2e3na
e6n7ang
en4dr
2enen
2ener
en3inn
2enn
en3ny
8eno
e6n3om.
en6sa6k
ens5kin
en2sv
ent7rar
ent7ren
ent7ret
en8u
e1ny
e1nø
en7øy
eome7
eomet6
e3ont
eor2d
eo3re
eori7e
e7oz
2ep
epi3kr
epi5p
ep1j
e1pl
e8plen
ep2li
e1po
e1pr
2e1ra
er3aks
e8r7av
e2r3ei
ereo3
er3ess
eret8h
erg3r
4eril
er3ind
6eringar
erkeri4
er8kle
erm8u
2ern
2ero
ero2i
er5ok
er7om.
ero3s
e8r7o8v
2err
ers4ka.
er7skarar
er8s7o8v
e1ru
erun8
er7und
e6rut
ervele8
e1ry
e5ræ
e1rø
er7å6k
er5å4l
2es
e8s7aa
es8an
esh7ar.
esh3er
es3het
esi4ar
e4sji
e4s3ke
es3kin
es5k4n
e3skr
es3lan
e7slo
es3lø
e1s2m
e8s7na
es5ne
e6s5od
es8ped
es3pin
esp3le
e8sta.
e3stal
e6stane
e5stans
e8star
es8tat.
es7ten
e8s7ter.
esterne8
e8s7tet
es4til
es6tr
es3tu
e3sty
est7øy
e1sv
es7vig
e1sy
2e1ta
e2taf
8etar
et5c
2ete
4eth
2eti
e3tja
e5tjer
2etn
e1to
et3ord
eto3s
8e3tr
et3re.
e7tri.
e7trie
et5rik
et3rin
et3ris
et3rum
et7rus
et4sl
ett7r
e1tu
e3tv
6etz
2etæ
e1tø
eu6b
eufo5
eu5kr
e3um.
e3ums
e1un
eu8ni
eu3nu
e5u6p
e8ut
2ev
ev7akt
e3var
e1ve
e6veld
e5vé
e1vi
evi5ere
e2vig
e4vinn
ev6nak
ev1r
e1væ
ew1
ex7is
ey1
e7yr
e1æ2
eær3
e7ø
e1å
é5e8
é5g
è1r
1fa
fa5ci
fag3r
f8al
fa6lu
fa5mø
farie8
fa5s6k
fast5r
fa4t3ri
2fb
8fd
1fe
fe7al
fe6da
feri8e7ne
fe7ro
fes7ta
8fety
1fé
6f1f
f8fice
ff7ro
f3fæ
6f3g2
4f3h
1fi
fi3ar
fibi8e7n
fi5cen
fici7
fi4el
fi5e6re
fing7r
fjø8ra
f2l
f4las
fla6tan
flo3i
f4lu
8fn
1fo
6foa
2foe
fo2r
for3a
fo8rae
for7ena
fore6ne
for7ent
for7e8te.
for7e8ten
for3in
fork8
for7o
fors5kar
fo3rum
for3æ2
for3ø
fost7r
f2r
1fra
f8rak
fre8e7
fri7a6re
fri7p
frus3
2f1s
f7sh
fsi4
f4s5l
f6sn
f8su
f1t
f4tam
f7tane
1f2to
f8tw
f6ty
1fu
fu5ro
fus3k
fus3t
1fy
2fæ
1fø
fø6rarar
1ga
5gag
ga8lem
ga6lim
gang3s4
ga7ny
ga3po
ga8sc
gas5t6ra
gas7tri
2g1b
6gc
2g1d2
g3dr
1ge
gedie7ne
6gedomma
8gedoms
g5eie
geir3
gei6ra
gelie7
geli6en
genle8
ge3nu
ge3ro
ge7rå
ge3sk
ge3s2p
ge3v
1gér
2g1f
2g1g
g7gla
g2gut
2g1h
ghe8n
gh6to
1gi
gi3ar
2g3inn
gi3ro
gis8tr
gist5ra
gi5strer
gi7stré
git3r
1gj
4g5k
2gl
g3land
g3lar
7glase
g5last
gle5s
g7l6j
gloria7
glori8an
glorie7
g2lu
3gly
2g1m
gmo6
2g1n
gnist7r
1go
go3ar
go8das
go6f6
6g7o6ma
gori7e
go3rø
7gos
go5v
g1p
1g2r4
6gr.
g8rad
gra2m
gran4s
g4ree
gre4en
greie7n
grei8ene
2grel
g3renn
g4ress
2grin
8gs
g6sa.
g8s7aa
g4s5a4k
gsa4m
g1sk
gs1l
gsle6g
g7s8p
g7stand
gste6e
gs6til
gs7to
gs3v
gs8va
2g1t
1gu
guid7ar
guid7en.
guid7ens
guid7er
gul8le.
gun2s3
gu6ri
gu3ru
2g1v
6g3w
g7ya
3gyr
5gør
g7ørs
gøy6e5ne
gøye8r
1gå
gå6as
gå2s
2hae
ha5ism
ha4kere
ha6kern
3hald
hani5
hanis6
ha6rol
har4tri
ha4sj
hasj7e
ha7v8a
2he.
he2d7r
heg3
he2gr
5h8ei
hek7
hem8jinga
hen7o8
hen3sl
h6era
he3ro
he8run
he4sja
he4s3je
het4s5i
he3va
h3hu
hid7
hi2e1
hi7en
hi8f7
hik7e
hi8los.
hip8l
6h6ir
hi7ro
h8is.
hi4sk
hi6to
hit5r
2hl
h7lan
2hm
hma8n
h7mi
2hn
h2na
hne8n
hn7n
hob2
ho6el
1hol
ho8la.
ho6lom
ho6lu
ho6s7a
hos7t
hou8s
ho3ve
hove6d7
how3
2hr
h1ra
h2ri
hro8
2h1s
2h1t
h6u
7hug
hun8dr
hu7ru
hu6sa
hu4sk
hust7re
h6v
hve6r7
hvo6
hyd4
hy2e3
hy2s3j
hø6g7r
hå2lø
ia7al
i3abl
iad4
ia3g2
i3akk
i3al.
i5alg
i3als
i3alt
i3an.
i3and
i3a4ne.
ia8nes
i3ang
i3ann
i3ans
i3ant
i5ao
i3ar.
i4are
i6ari
iaria7
iarie8
i7arn
i7ars
i5asm
i3ast
i8at
i1b
i2bl
i4b5le
i7bo
ibo8e
i7br
ib8t
ibu8a
8icanarar
i8ce.
i1ci
ick7ers.
i1co
ic3t
i3cu
idie7ne
i8d1j
id7ran
id8ru
i2d3un
i3dø
i1e
i6eg
i6ela
i2em
ie2n
i2end
i5ende.
ie3ner
ie3ni
i3er.
i2ere
i2eri
ie7ro
ier2r
ier7ska
ie8ru
ie3s4c
ie7té
ie8tr
i5fa
iferi9e8
ifes3
if3l
if3re
if3ri
i3fø
4ig
iges3
igha8
i2g3ia
igje7va
ig1l
igl8d
i4gn
ig7ni
ig7sv
i3gy
8i1h
i7ha
i3hen
i7hj
i7ho
ihu6g
i7hv
i7hø
i1i
i1j
i1ka
i8kh
ikha8n
i1ki
iki7s6t
ik1l
i1ko
ik3r
i1ku
i2kut
ik1v
ik4vie
i1ky
i1kø
i5kå
i1la
i5lag
i4l3ak
i7land.
ilas3t
8ild.
ili6e7ne
i3lik
ili5s6tik
il3k
il4lop
i1lo
i6lom
il7or
i1lu
i3ly
imb6
imp2
i1mu
i7mø
in7ann
in3au
in8dem
inderle8
4ine
8iné
in2g3r
in4gri
in8gut
in6g7ø
4ini
in4k3la
in4kve
in6nad
in8n7om
in8nø
in7og.
in7s8kas
ins7ten
i1nu
in7un
i3ny
i1nø
in7øy
8io1
io3g2
io8v
i1pi
i6p5ings
i4p3la
i4ple
ip2li
i7pol
i1ra
irda8
i7ret
iri6a
ir4kla
ir4kle
ir7m
irt8
i1ru
ir7w
isch3
is3co
ise8a
ise3i
isensi6
isfa8re.
is1h
is6h7i
6isi
i6s7ju
is1k
is4kap
is7ke
isk5rin
is1l
i4slu
i4s3m
is3n
i6so.
i2sot
is1p
isso8a
is1t
i7s6ted
i5s4tem
is4tent
is6té
is4tra
ist7rane
ist5rar
ist5ren
i8st7rer.
ist7res
ist5rin
is3un
is3ut
is1v
is5w
i1sy
is7ørs
4i1ta
i6t7ang
itau6e
it8es7
i1té
i7ti
iti6er
i6tj
it7jaran
it7je
i1to
it7om
it7o8v
i3tral
it3ret
it3rin
i3t4ris
i3tro
i5tru
it2s3l
it6tr
i1tu
itu7e
i7tv
i1ty
i1tø
i7ub
i7ul
i7um.
iu6m7i
i3ums
i3us.
i1v
i3va
iva6rete
i3ver
iverle8
i7vev
5ivold
iv3r
i7væ
i2vø
i1w
iwi5
i3zo
i5ør.
iør3i
i5øy
iå8
i7åk
ja7ar
ja5gr
jan6g7r
2jd
jeep3
jek7l
je4lø
jen5d
6jenl
jes3k
jes7tan
je6s7v
je4t3r
je5van
je6varar
je7vo
j5h
3jings
ji5ro
ji6sj
4j3k
8jm
jo8ar
4jod
jo4fl
jo5r4u
jout6
2js
j4u
jub5l
ju4e7re
ju4st
jæ4ras
jærle8ge
jø7i
2jå
1ka.
ka3br
kadi7e
7kae
ka3ism
ka8n7om
kan4t3r
ka3po
3kar.
ka3ru
kas7p
kas3tr
kavi8
2k1b
2kc
6k1d
1ke
keg6
ke5gl
ke3k
8keme
keny2
ke5or
ke3pi
ke3ro
6kesd
ke3sk
4ke5sp
kest3r
ke5s8å
k8ete.
4keu
ke7v
1ké4
két3
2k1f
2k1h
k2ha
k7ham
7khan
kh3en
kh5er
kh4m
8khu
ki7dé
ki8la.
kimo3
kin7and
kip5l
ki7ro
ki8ten
7kjan
7kjare
8kjed
6k1k
k6k7inn
k2kle
kk2li
k2k3ut
k2k1v
k6k7y
kl6
8kl.
2kla.
3klam
k5lane.
kla4t3
kla7ta
k2led
k2lee
k2lem
2klen
k4lero
kli6ene
k6lit
k3log
k2læ
klø4i
6k1m
2kn
kna4tri
k6nip
knit3
5kn6u
knu7te
3kny
kn3øy
ko5ak
ko3b8r
koie7
koi6ene
ko3in
ko4me.
ko8mi.
ko2nu
ko1o
kop7l
kor4e
ko3sl
kot6s7
kou4
ko3ve
k3p
k2r4
krani8e7n
kra4s3j
3kresj
k4ris
7krisene
k6rit
kro8ar
kråe4
2k1s
ks3alt
ks3hi
ksi3s2
k2s1k
k3s2ka
k2s9l
k2sm
k2sn
k8sod
k6sog
k2sot
k2s1p
k2s1t
k3s4til
ks3tr
ks4t5ri
ks7w
ks3ær
8k1t
k7ta
k7te
kterie7n
kterie9ns
ktori7e8
k2t3re
k4t5ru
ku7an
kuf3
ku3in
ku7is
kun2s
kuns7tar
kuns5te
ku6o
kus5t
6kut.
4kute.
ku3to
ku3tø
kuu4
kvari6en
k6via
kvi6ene
4kvik
4k3w
ky3k
kyl6v
kyri8e7ne
5kæ
k7øyd
køy6ene
køy6rar
kå3ra
1la.
la3br
ladi7e8
